Utah statutes.
53-10-211.   Notice required of arrest of school employee for controlled substance or sex offense.

(1)  The chief administrative officer of the law enforcement agency making the arrest or receiving notice under Subsection (2) shall immediately notify the following individuals:

(a)  the administrator of teacher certification in the State Office of Education; and

(b)  the superintendent of schools of the employing public school district or, if the offender is an employee of a private school, the administrator of that school.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies upon:

(a)  the arrest of any school employee for any offense:

(i)  in Section 58-37-8;

(ii)  in Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4, Sexual Offenses; or

(iii)  involving sexual conduct; or

(b)  upon receiving notice from any other jurisdiction that a school employee has committed an act which would, if committed in Utah, be an offense under Subsection (2)(a).

